src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON LADDUUH !!= * __@CODE@__  
+Pl+Nom:^SV^SLEN%>h flagK ; 			! spálvááh
+Pl+Gen:%>i flagK ; 			! spálvái
+Pl+Acc:%>id flagK ; 			! spálváid
+Pl+Ill:%>id flagK ; 			! spálváid
+Pl+Loc:%>in flagK ; 			! spálváin
+Pl+Com:%>iguin flagK ; 		! spálváiguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igijn flagK ; 		! spálváiguin
+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá flagK ; 		! spálváittáá
+Cmp/PlNom:^SV^SLEN%>h RProp ; 

LEXICON MAADIJ-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to AARRAN
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: MAADIJ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON MAADIJ !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to AARRAN
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;					! aarrân
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;					! aarrân
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;					! aarrân
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân flagK ;	! aṛânân
+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist flagK ;	! aṛânist
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin flagK ;			! aṛânáin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ;			! aarrânttáá
+Cmp/SgNom:  RProp ; 

!LEXICON KUAVLU-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KUAVLU ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
!
!LEXICON KUAVLU
!+Attr: flagK ;
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! vuággu
!+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;     ! vuágu
!+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;     ! vuágu
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>n flagK ;      ! vuágun
!+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st flagK ; ! vuágust
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! vuággoin
!+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;     ! vuáguttáá
!+Cmp/SgNom:  RProp ; 


LEXICON IANUDAH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to 4JOTOLAH
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: IANUDAH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON IANUDAH
+Cmp/SgNom:âh  RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:uv  RProp ; 
+Sg+Nom:âh flagK ;
+Sg+Gen:uv flagK ;
+Sg+Acc:uv flagK ;
+Sg+Ill:âh%>ân flagK ;
+Sg+Loc:uvv%>âst flagK ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:uv%>âst flagK ; !Iänuduvâst in corpus, more than Iänuduvvâst
+Sg+Com:uvv%>áin flagK ;
+Sg+Abe:uv%>ttáá flagK ;

LEXICON 4LAS_PROP-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:  4LAS_PROP ;

LEXICON 4LAS_PROP-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:  4LAS_PROP ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:áá BEL ;


LEXICON 4LAS_PROP-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:  4LAS_PROP ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON 4LAS_PROP
+Sg+Nom:âš flagK ;
+Sg+Gen:áá flagK ;
+Sg+Acc:áá flagK ;
+Sg+Ill:á%>in flagK ;
+Sg+Loc:áá%>st flagK ;
+Sg+Com:á%>in flagK ;
+Ess:âžž%>ân flagK ;
!+Par:âžž%>âd flagK ;


LEXICON 4KUNAGAS-org !!= * __@CODE@__ 
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:@U.Cap.Obl@ X_KUNAGAS_SG ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES-org !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: SME_NAMES_PERS_flag ;


LEXICON SME_NAMES-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SME_NAMES_PERS_flag ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SME_NAMES_PERS_flag ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SME_NAMES_PERS_flag ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SME_NAMES ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES_PERS_flag 
@U.Cap.Obl@ SME_NAMES_PERS ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES_PERS !!= * __@CODE@__ Attr to North Saami person names
+Attr: # ;	
SME_NAMES ;

LEXICON SME_NAMES !!= * __@CODE@__ temp. only Sg+Nom and Cmp to North Saami names
+Sg+Nom: # ;	
+Sg+Gen+Err/Lex: # ;	
+Sg+Loc+Err/Lex:%>st # ; ! XXX look at this
+Sg+Ill+Err/Lex:%>n # ; ! XXX look at this
 PERSNAME-CMPflag ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Lex:  RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Lex:  RProp ; 

LEXICON PERSNAME-CMPflag 
@U.Cap.Obl@ PERSNAME-NOMCMP ;

LEXICON PERSNAME-GENCMPflag 
@U.Cap.Obl@ PERSNAME-NOMCMP ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PERSNAME-GENCMP ;


LEXICON PERSNAME-NOMCMPflag 
@U.Cap.Obl@ PERSNAME-NOMCMP ;

LEXICON PERSNAME-NOMCMP !!= * __@CODE@__ e.g. Anttikandâ,  
 +Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#nommâsâš:#-nommâs ANOLASJ ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#merkkâsâš:#-merkkâs ANOLASJ ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#kandâ:#ka^RVndâ 2ALGA ; !Anttikandâ
 +Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#nieidâ:#niei4dâ 2ALGA ;

LEXICON PERSNAME-GENCMP !!= * __@CODE@__ e.g. , Aanti-kyevtis
 +Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#kyevtis:0#-kuáhtás^ÁI 3COLL ;


LEXICON flagK !!= * __@CODE@__ 
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;
 
LEXICON BEL
+Cmp#pel+Adv+Use/NG:#bel K ;
+Cmp#peln+Adv+Use/NG:#beln K ;
+Cmp#pel+Adv:#pel K ;
+Cmp#peln+Adv:#peln K ;



 
 
